nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Avfallssystemer og -verktøy for husdyr: Hundeposer; Brett til kattetoaletter; Avfallssystemer for husdyr; Avfallsskjeer
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Strumenti e sistemi per lo smaltimento delle deiezioni di animali domestici: Borse per cani; Vassoi per rifiuti; Sistemi di smaltimento dei rifiuti domestici; Raccoglitori di rifiuti
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállat-hulladékeltávolító rendszerek és eszközök: Kutyustáskák; Alomtálcák; Háziállat-hulladékeltávolító rendszerek; Hulladéklapátok
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Atığı Temizleme Sistemleri ve Araçları: Köpek Çantaları; Çöp Tepsileri; Evcil Hayvan Atık Sistemleri; Atık Kepçeleri
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin jäteastiat ja työkalut: Koirien kakkapussit; Hiekka-astiat; Lemmikin jätteenkäsittelyjärjestelmät; Jätelapiot
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Hệ thống & Dụng cụ xử lý chất thải thú cưng: Túi hốt phân; Khay vệ sinh; Hệ thống xử lý chất thải thú cưng; Dụng cụ hốt phân
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Sustavi i alati za zbrinjavanje otpada kućnih ljubimaca: Vrećice za pse; Kutije s pijeskom; Sustavi za odlaganje otpada kućnih ljubimaca; Lopatice za otpad
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物垃圾处理系统/工具: 剩餐袋; 猫砂盘; 宠物垃圾处理系统; 垃圾铲
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Инструменты для уборки за животными и системы утилизации отходов: Пакеты для уборки за собаками; Лотки; Системы утилизации отходов; Совки для уборки
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Entsorgungssysteme & -werkzeug für Tierkot: Hundetaschen; Schalentoiletten für Katzen; Entsorgungssysteme für Haustierausscheidungen; Kotschaufeln
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Systémy a nástroje na likvidáciu odpadu pre domácich miláčikov: Vrecia pre psov; Toalety; Nástroje na likvidáciu odpadu pre domácich miláčikov; Naberačky odpadu
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Systemen en hulpmiddelen voor afval van huisdieren: Hondenpoepzakjes; Afvalbakken; Systemen voor afval van huisdieren; Afvalscheppers
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Naminių gyvūnų išmatų šalinimo sistemos ir priemonės: Maišeliai šunų išmatoms; Kraiko padėklai; Naminių gyvūnų išmatų šalinimo sistemos; Išmatų semtuvėliai
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > System och verktyg för husdjursavföring: Hundpåsar; Kattsandsbrickor; Avfallshanteringssystem för husdjur; Avfallsspadar
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Системи и инструменти за изхвърляне на отпадъци от домашни любимци: Кучешки чанти; Табли за котешка тоалетна; Системи за изхвърляне на отпадъци от домашни любимци; Лопатки за отпадъци
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Systemer og værktøjer til bortskaffelse af afføring fra kæledyr: Hundeposer; Kattebakker; Systemer til bortskaffelse af afføring fra kæledyr; Skovle til kattebakker
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 대소변 처리 장치/도구: 반려견 배변 봉투; 반려묘 화장실; 반려동물 대소변 처리 장치; 폐기물 수거 기구
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用トイレ用具: ドギーバッグ; 猫砂トレイ; ペット用トイレシステム; ペットのうんちスクーパー
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Sisteme și instrumente pentru eliminarea pungilor igienice pentru animale de companie: Pungi igienice pentru câini; Litiere; Sisteme pentru eliminarea pungilor igienice pentru animale de companie; Lopățele pentru litieră
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Συστήματα & εργαλεία απόρριψης απορριμμάτων κατοικίδιων ζώων: Σακούλες για απορρίμματα σκύλων; Δίσκοι απορριμμάτων; Συστήματα διάθεσης απορριμμάτων κατοικίδιων ζώων; Σκούπες για απορρίμματα κατοικίδιων ζώων
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Urządzenia i narzędzia do usuwania odchodów: Torby dla psów; Kuwety dla zwierząt; Narzędzia do usuwania odchodów; Łopatki na odchody
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Outils et systèmes de traitement des déjections d’animaux de compagnie: Sacs pour chiens; Bacs à litière; Systèmes de traitement des déjections d’animaux de compagnie; Ramasse-déchets
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Equipamento e sistemas de eliminação de resíduos para animais de estimação: Sacos para dejetos de cães; Caixas de areia abertas; Sistemas de eliminação de resíduos para animais de estimação; Pás para dejetos
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > ระบบและเครื่องมือทิ้งของเสียจากสัตว์เลี้ยง: ถุงใส่อาหารเหลือ; ถาดใส่ขยะ; ระบบทิ้งของเสียจากสัตว์เลี้ยง; ที่ตักขยะ
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Sistemas e ferramentas de descarte de lixo de animais: Sacos para fezes de cachorros; Bandejas sanitárias; Sistemas de eliminação de resíduos de animais de estimação; Coletores de resíduos
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Systémy a nástroje na exkrementy domácích zvířat: Sáčky na psí exkrementy; Toalety bez krytu; Systémy pro likvidaci exkrementů domácích mazlíčcích; Lopatky na exkrementy
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Waste Disposal Systems & Tools: Doggy Bags; Litter Trays; Pet Waste Disposal Systems; Waste Scoopers
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Herramientas y sistemas de desecho de excrementos: Bolsas para perros; Bandejas de arena; Sistemas de eliminación de desechos de mascotas; Recogedores de basura
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Sistemi za odstranjevanje iztrebkov hišnih ljubljenčkov: Vrečke za pasje iztrebke; Mačje stranišče; Sistemi za odstranjevanje iztrebkov hišnih ljubljenčkov; Lopatice za odstranjevanje iztrebkov
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物拾便器具: 狗拾便袋; 貓砂箱; 寵物拾便系統; 鏟便器